Washington statutes.
RCW 16.08.050

Entrance on private property, when lawful.

A person is lawfully upon the private property of such owner within the meaning of RCW 16.08.040 when such person is upon the property of the owner with the express or implied consent of the owner: PROVIDED, That said consent shall not be presumed when the property of the owner is fenced or reasonably posted.

[ 1979 c 148 s 1; 1941 c 77 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 3109-2.]